District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2317

Collection; liens.

Repealed.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 20
as added Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-128, § 11(i), 28 DCR 246
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(o), 46 DCR 2118
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(pp)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-2317.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”